test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-genpl_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - genpl - ok : # Noun 'picture'
#     elläin+N+Pl+Gen: elläimiitten
#    assii+N+Pl+Gen: assiitten
#     veres+N+Pl+Gen: veresten
     aika+N+Pl+Gen: [aikkoin, aioitten, aijoitten]
     assii+N+Pl+Gen: assiitten
     asukas+N+Pl+Gen: asukkhaitten
     elläin+N+Pl+Gen: elläimiitten
     häät+N+Pl+Gen: häitten
     hirsi+N+Pl+Gen: hirssiin
     hoppee+N+Pl+Gen: hoppeitten
     housut+N+Pl+Gen: houssuitten
     huonet+N+Pl+Gen: huonheitten
     hyksi+N+Pl+Gen: hyksiin
     hyljet+N+Pl+Gen: hylkheitten
     ihminen+N+Pl+Gen: ihmisten
     joki+N+Pl+Gen: jokkiin
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Gen: kainulaisten
     kajava+N+Pl+Gen: [kajaviitten, kajavitten]
     karamelli+N+Pl+Gen: karamelliitten
     käsi+N+Pl+Gen: kässiin
     kasvot+N+Pl+Gen: kasvoitten
     kauhee+N+Pl+Gen: kauheitten
     kieli+N+Pl+Gen: kieliin
     kirves+N+Pl+Gen: kirvheitten
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Gen: kulkkiijoitten
     kurkkio+N+Pl+Gen: kurkkioitten
     kuva+N+Pl+Gen: kuvviin
     lapsi+N+Pl+Gen: [lapsiin, lasten, lapsitten]
     linna+N+Pl+Gen: [linnoin, linnoitten]
     lumi+N+Pl+Gen: lummiin   
     maa+N+Pl+Gen: maitten
     meininki+N+Pl+Gen: meiningiitten
     mies+N+Pl+Gen: miehiin
     nainen+N+Pl+Gen: naisten
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Gen: opettaajiitten
     paivukko+N+Pl+Gen: paivukoitten
     pappi+N+Pl+Gen: [pappiin, papitten]
     perintö+N+Pl+Gen: perinnöitten
     poika+N+Pl+Gen: poikkiin
     rakas+N+Pl+Gen: rakkhaitten
     ruvis+N+Pl+Gen: rukhiitten
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Gen: sairhauksiitten
     sieni+N+Pl+Gen: sieniin
     sivakka+N+Pl+Gen: sivakoitten
     suomi+N+Pl+Gen: suomiin
     syksy+N+Pl+Gen: [syksyin, syksyitten]
     taival+N+Pl+Gen: taipaliitten
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Gen: tervheisten
     tie+N+Pl+Gen: teitten
     tooli+N+Pl+Gen: [tooliin, tooliitten]
     tunturi+N+Pl+Gen: tunturiitten
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Gen: tuorestaitten
     työ+N+Pl+Gen: töitten
     tytär+N+Pl+Gen: tyttäriitten
     valkkee+N+Pl+Gen: valkkeitten
     veljekset+N+Pl+Gen: veljesten
     venet+N+Pl+Gen: venheitten
     veres+N+Pl+Gen: veresten
     vuosi+N+Pl+Gen: vuossiin
     yđin+N+Pl+Gen: ytimiitten
